Utah statutes.
20A-6-401.1.   Ballots for partisan municipal primary elections.

(1)  If a municipality is using paper ballots, each election officer shall ensure that:

(a)  all paper ballots furnished for use at the regular primary election:

(i)  are perforated to separate the candidates of one political party from those of the other political parties so that the voter may separate the part of the ballot containing the names of the political party of the voter's choice from the rest of the ballot;

(ii)  have sides that are perforated so that the outside sections of the ballot, when detached, are similar in appearance to the inside sections of the ballot when detached; and

(iii)  contain no captions or other endorsements except as provided in this section;

(b)  the names of all candidates from each party are listed on the same ballot in one or more columns under their party name and emblem;

(c)  the political parties are printed on the ballot in the order specified under Section 20A-6-305;

(d) (i)  the ballot contains a ballot stub that is at least one inch wide, placed across the top of the ballot;

(ii)  the ballot number and the words "Poll Worker's Initials ____" are printed on the stub; and

(iii)  ballot stubs are numbered consecutively;

(e)  immediately below the perforated ballot stub, the following endorsements are printed in 18-point bold type:

(i)  "Official Primary Ballot for ____ County, Utah";

(ii)  the date of the election; and

(iii)  a facsimile of the signature of the county clerk and the words "county clerk";

(f)  after the facsimile signature, the political party emblem and the name of the political party are printed;

(g)  after the party name and emblem, the ballot contains the following printed in not smaller than 10-point bold face, double leaded type: "Instructions to Voters: To vote for a candidate, place a cross (X) in the square immediately adjacent to the name of the person for whom you wish to vote and in no other place.  Do not vote for any candidate listed under more than one party or group designation.", followed by two one-point parallel horizontal rules;

(h)  after the rules, the designation of the office for which the candidates seek nomination is printed flush with the left-hand margin and the words, "Vote for one" or "Vote for up to _____ (the number of candidates for which the voter may vote)" are printed to extend to the extreme right of the column in 10-point bold type, followed by a hair-line rule;

(i)  after the hair-line rule, the names of the candidates are printed in heavy face type between lines or rules three-eighths inch apart, in the order specified under Section 20A-6-305 with surnames last and grouped according to the office that they seek;

(j)  a square with sides not less than one-fourth inch long is printed immediately adjacent to the names of the candidates;

(k)  the candidate groups are separated from each other by one light and one heavy line or rule; and

(l)  the nonpartisan candidates are listed as follows:

(i)  immediately below the listing of the party candidates, the word "NONPARTISAN" is printed in reverse type in an 18 point solid rule that extends the full width of the type copy of the party listing above; and

(ii)  below "NONPARTISAN," the office, the number of candidates to vote for, the candidate's name, the voting square, and any other necessary information is printed in the same style and manner as for party candidates.

(2) (a)  If a municipality is using ballot sheets or electronic ballots, the election officer may require that:

(i)  the ballot, or ballot label in the case of a punch card ballot, for a regular primary election consist of several groups of pages or display screens, so that a separate group can be used to list the names of candidates seeking nomination of each qualified political party, with additional groups used to list candidates for other nonpartisan offices;

(ii)  the separate groups of pages or display screens are identified by color or other suitable means; and

(iii)  the ballot or ballot label contain instructions that direct the voter how to vote the ballot.

(b)  If a municipality is using ballot sheets or electronic ballots, each election officer shall:

(i)  for municipalities using punch card ballots, ensure that the ballot label provides a means for the voter to designate the political party in whose primary the voter is voting; and

(ii)  determine the order for printing the names of the political parties on the ballot label in accordance with Section 20A-6-305.

